Maryland, session 2026, HB1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
4–501.
(b) (1) “Accessory dwelling unit” means a secondary dwelling unit that is:
(i) on the same lot, parcel, or tract as a primary single–family
detached dwelling unit; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1236*

HOUSE BILL 1236
(ii) not greater than 75% of the size of and subordinate in use to the
primary single–family detached dwelling unit.
(2) “Accessory dwelling unit” includes a structure that is:
(i) separate from the primary single–family detached dwelling unit;
or
(ii) attached as an addition to the primary single–family detached
dwelling unit.
8–105.
For the purposes of this title, each local jurisdiction may designate boundaries for
sites, structures, and districts that are considered to be of historic, archaeological, or
architectural significance, by following the procedures of the local jurisdiction for
establishing or changing zoning districts and classifications.
Article – Real Property
2–126.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Accessory dwelling unit” has the meaning stated in § 4–501 of the Land
Use Article.
(3) “Restriction on use” includes any covenant, restriction, or condition
contained in:
(i) A deed;
(ii) A declaration;
(iii) A contract;
(iv) The bylaws or rules of a homeowners association;
(v) A security instrument; or
(vi) Any other instrument affecting:
1. The transfer or sale of real property; or
2. Any other interest in real property.

HOUSE BILL 1236 3
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection, if a property
owner has the exclusive right to use the property and abides by all applicable laws and
regulations, a restriction on use regarding land use may not impose or act to impose an
unreasonable limitation on the ability of the property owner to develop or offer for rent an
accessory dwelling unit.
(2) For the purpose of paragraph (1) of this subsection, an unreasonable
limitation:
(i) Includes a limitation that prohibits, either explicitly or by effect
of the restrictions, the development of an accessory dwelling unit; and
(ii) Does not include a limitation on the short–term rental of an
accessory dwelling unit.
(c) This section does not apply to a restriction on use on [historic]:
(1) HISTORIC property that is listed in or determined by the Director of
the Maryland Historical Trust to be eligible for inclusion in the Maryland Register of
Historic Properties; OR
(2) PROPERTY LOCATED WITHIN A DISTRICT DESIGNATED BY THE
APPLICABLE LOCAL JURISDICTION TO BE OF HISTORIC SIGNIFICANCE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–105 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.